Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB877.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of providing property tax exemptions for property
owned by a senior who is 65 years of age or older and property owned by a former
member of the United States Armed Forces, including the National Guard, who is 100%
service-connected combat-related disabled and, upon his death, property owned by his or
her surviving spouse by amending the Constitution of Kentucky to read as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 170 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
There shall be exempt from taxation public property used for public purposes;
places of burial not held for private or corporate profit; real property owned and occupied
by, and personal property both tangible and intangible owned by, institutions of religion;
institutions of purely public charity, and institutions of education not used or employed
for gain by any person or corporation, and the income of which is devoted solely to the
cause of education, public libraries, their endowments, and the income of such property
as is used exclusively for their maintenance; household goods of a person used in his
home; crops grown in the year in which the assessment is made, and in the hands of the
producer; property owned by a senior who is sixty-five years of age or older; property
owned by a former member of the United States Armed Forces, including the National
Guard, who is one hundred percent service-connected combat-related disabled and
upon the death of the former member, property owned by his or her surviving spouse;
and real property maintained as the permanent residence of the owner, who is [sixty-five
years of age or older, or is ]classified as totally disabled under a program authorized or
administered by an agency of the United States government or by any retirement system
either within or without the Commonwealth of Kentucky, provided the property owner
received disability payments pursuant to such disability classification, has maintained
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1522
such disability classification for the entirety of the particular taxation period, and has
filed with the appropriate local assessor by December 31 of the taxation period, on forms
provided therefor, a signed statement indicating continuing disability as provided herein
made under penalty of perjury, up to the assessed valuation of sixty-five hundred dollars
on said residence and contiguous real property, except for assessment for special benefits.
The real property may be held by legal or equitable title, by the entireties, jointly, in
common, as a condominium, or indirectly by the stock ownership or membership
representing the owner's or member's proprietary interest in a corporation owning a fee or
a leasehold initially in excess of ninety-eight years. The exemptions shall apply only to
the value of the real property assessable to the owner or, in case of ownership through
stock or membership in a corporation, the value of the proportion which his interest in the
corporation bears to the assessed value of the property. The General Assembly may
authorize any incorporated city or town to exempt manufacturing establishments from
municipal taxation, for a period not exceeding five years, as an inducement to their
location. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 3, 172, and 174 of this Constitution
to the contrary, the General Assembly may provide by law an exemption for all or any
portion of the property tax for any class of personal property.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1522
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Section 6. If the exemptions created by the proposed amendment to the
Constitution of Kentucky in Section 2 of this Act are ratified by the voters of the
Commonwealth, the exemptions shall only apply to property assessed on or after January
1, 2027.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:28 PM Jacketed